Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Universal Representation Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Interest earned by the Universal Representation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services for the purpose of disbursement to the  fiscal agent described in section
2 (1) of this 2022 Act for providing a statewide integrated, universal  navigation and repre-
sentation system for immigration matters.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) A nonprofit organization registered in this state that addresses and
executes worker relief as the organization’s primary purpose shall serve as the  fiscal agent
to award grants to organizations to provide services related to immigration matters through
a universal representation program. Funds must be allocated for, but are not  limited to, the
following purposes:
(A) Attorneys working at community-based organizations to provide culturally responsive
services to members of the immigrant and refugee community;
(B) Navigators working at community-based organizations  to guide persons who are at
risk of deportation or need  assistance with immigration matters into the universal repre-
sentation program;
(C) Development of capacity and training to support navigation efforts through
community-based organizations into the universal representation program and  culturally
responsive services carried out by community-based organizations;
(D) A client service fund to assist with fees associated with filings, interpretation and
related costs in immigration matters;
(E) A statewide universal navigation  and support system, including a call center, to
provide direct contacts and streamlined access for those seeking assistance with immigration
matters; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1543 (SB 1543-A) Page 1
(F) A clearinghouse to  provide logistical support, income and program eligibility screen-
ing, navigation review, case placement and technical assistance, and referral  coordination,
mentoring and supervision of attorneys working for community-based organizations.
(b) All individuals  seeking services through the universal representation program must
be enrolled and are subject to an income and program eligibility screening and a priority
recommendation through the clearinghouse described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Information provided to the  clearinghouse described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section is subject to the lawyer-client privilege under ORS 40.225.
(2) For all grants awarded under this  section by the fiscal agent described in subsection
(1) of this section, the fiscal agent shall:
(a) Create a  uniform method of reporting grant outcomes to facilitate comparison of re-
sults between grant recipients;
(b) Require that grant recipients provide services free of charge;
(c) Require grant recipients to prioritize legal services to detained individuals and indi-
viduals at imminent risk of deportation before other immigration matters when applicable;
(d) Require all individuals seeking services to be enrolled and subject to a uniform income
and program eligibility screening and a priority recommendation through the clearinghouse
described in subsection (1) of this section;
(e) Provide services to all income- and program-eligible individuals subject  to reasonably
measured capacity;
(f) Encourage the use of best practices to design the delivery of legal services to  the
immigrant and refugee population; and
(g) Ensure that a person denied services receives notice of the reasons  for denial and
that the notice is provided to the fiscal agent.
(3) The fiscal agent described in subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Issue grants through a request for proposal process;
(b) Conduct a performance audit at the conclusion of the second year after the Universal
Representation Fund established under section  1 of this 2022 Act is operative and every two
years thereafter; and
(c) Conduct a financial audit at the conclusion of the second year after the fund is op-
erative and every two years thereafter.
(4)(a) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall transfer funds appropriated for this
purpose to the Oregon State Bar for use by the Legal Services  Program established under
ORS 9.572 to provide legal services to individuals on immigration matters  and related mat-
ters, including but not limited to the provision of general legal information and legal  referral
services designed to increase access to the justice system.
(b) The Legal Services Program shall adopt standards  and guidelines for the provision
of services under this subsection  that are consistent with the requirements set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The fiscal  agent described in subsection (1) of this section shall convene an advisory
committee for the universal representation program.  The advisory committee shall meet
periodically and make recommendations relating to  the coordination of services, standards
and guidelines, the  development of best practices and other matters related to universal
representation. The committee shall be chaired by:
(a) The administrative head,  or the designee of the administrative head, of the fiscal
agent described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The administrative head, or the designee  of the administrative head, of a grantee
under subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) The administrative head, or the designee of the administrative head,  of a legal ser-
vices provider providing services under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) No later than August 31  of each year, the fiscal agent described in subsection (1) of
this section shall submit,  to a committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly
Enrolled Senate Bill 1543 (SB 1543-A) Page 2
dealing with legal services, the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and the Leg-
islative Fiscal Officer,  a report on the grants the fiscal agent awarded under this section.
The report must specify, but is not limited to:
(a) How many individuals have entered the universal representation program;
(b) How  many individuals have accepted wraparound assistance from community-based
organizations;
(c) The number and types of cases and matters  in which legal services were delivered,
disaggregated by grantee;
(d) The counties in which the community-based organizations have provided services;
(e) A comparison of programs offering  services and recommendations to improve service
delivery for community-based organizations receiving funds from the fiscal agent;
(f) The findings  of performance and fiscal audits described in subsection (3)(b) and (c) of
this section; and
(g) Other matters as recommended by the advisory committee.
(7) In appropriating  moneys for programs under this section, the Legislative Assembly
shall endeavor to allocate funding as follows:
(a) 70 percent of available funds to the Universal Representation Fund established under
section 1 of this 2022 Act; and
(b) 30 percent of available funds to the Judicial  Department for purposes of transfer to
the Oregon State Bar under subsection (4) of this section.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” means a nonprofit organization  registered in this
state that provides culturally responsive services to immigrant and refugee communities in
Oregon.
(b) “Culturally responsive service” means a  service that is respectful of, and relevant to,
the beliefs, practices, cultures and  linguistic needs of diverse consumer or client populations
and communities whose members identify as having particular cultural or  linguistic affil-
iations by virtue of their place of birth,  ancestry or ethnic origin, religion, preferred lan-
guage or language spoken at home, and that has the capacity to respond to  the issues of
diverse communities and to require knowledge and capacity at systemic, organizational,
professional and individual levels of intervention.
(c) “Immigration matter” has the meaning given that term in ORS 9.280.
SECTION 3.
The fiscal agent described in section 2 (1)  of this 2022 Act shall make the
first report described in section 2 (6) of this 2022 Act no later than August 31, 2024.
SECTION 4. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,500,000, for deposit in the Universal
Representation Fund established under section 1 of this 2022 Act and disbursement to Oregon
Worker Relief as the fiscal agent under section 1 of this 2022 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Judicial Department, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the
amount of $4,500,000, for the purposes of implementing section 2 (4) of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$10,500,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  for the Universal
Representation Fund established in section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1543 (SB 1543-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1543 (SB 1543-A) Page 4